New.aff
# Cross product of near past tense subject markers (G) and object markers (F)
# Generated via script to handle chaining (e.g., Baazilidde)
PFX P Y 576
PFX P 0 nnan [^lmn]
PFX P l nnand l.[^mn]
PFX P l nnann l.[mn]
PFX P w nnamp [w]
PFX P 0 nnamu .
PFX P 0 nnaba .
PFX P 0 nnagu .
PFX P 0 nnagi .
PFX P 0 nnazi .
PFX P 0 nnaki .
PFX P 0 nnabi .
PFX P 0 nnali .
PFX P 0 nnaga .
PFX P 0 nnaka .
PFX P 0 nnabu .
PFX P 0 nnalu .
PFX P 0 nnaku .
PFX P 0 nnatu .
PFX P 0 wan [^lmn]
PFX P l wand l.[^mn]
PFX P l wann l.[mn]
PFX P w wamp [w]
PFX P 0 wamu .
PFX P 0 waba .
PFX P 0 wagu .
PFX P 0 wagi .
PFX P 0 wazi .
PFX P 0 waki .
PFX P 0 wabi .
PFX P 0 wali .
PFX P 0 waga .
PFX P 0 waka .
PFX P 0 wabu .
PFX P 0 walu .
PFX P 0 waku .
PFX P 0 watu .
PFX P 0 yan [^lmn]
PFX P l yand l.[^mn]
PFX P l yann l.[mn]
PFX P w yamp [w]
PFX P 0 yamu .
PFX P 0 yaba .
PFX P 0 yagu .
PFX P 0 yagi .
PFX P 0 yazi .
PFX P 0 yaki .
PFX P 0 yabi .
PFX P 0 yali .
PFX P 0 yaga .
PFX P 0 yaka .
PFX P 0 yabu .
PFX P 0 yalu .
PFX P 0 yaku .
PFX P 0 yatu .
PFX P 0 eyan [^lmn]
PFX P l eyand l.[^mn]
PFX P l eyann l.[mn]
PFX P w eyamp [w]
PFX P 0 eyamu .
PFX P 0 eyaba .
PFX P 0 eyagu .
PFX P 0 eyagi .
PFX P 0 eyazi .
PFX P 0 eyaki .
PFX P 0 eyabi .
PFX P 0 eyali .
PFX P 0 eyaga .
PFX P 0 eyaka .
PFX P 0 eyabu .
PFX P 0 eyalu .
PFX P 0 eyaku .
PFX P 0 eyatu .
PFX P 0 twan [^lmn]
PFX P l twand l.[^mn]
PFX P l twann l.[mn]
PFX P w twamp [w]
PFX P 0 twamu .
PFX P 0 twaba .
PFX P 0 twagu .
PFX P 0 twagi .
PFX P 0 twazi .
PFX P 0 twaki .
PFX P 0 twabi .
PFX P 0 twali .
PFX P 0 twaga .
PFX P 0 twaka .
PFX P 0 twabu .
PFX P 0 twalu .
PFX P 0 twaku .
PFX P 0 twatu .
PFX P 0 mwan [^lmn]
PFX P l mwand l.[^mn]
PFX P l mwann l.[mn]
PFX P w mwamp [w]
PFX P 0 mwamu .
PFX P 0 mwaba .
PFX P 0 mwagu .
PFX P 0 mwagi .
PFX P 0 mwazi .
PFX P 0 mwaki .
PFX P 0 mwabi .
PFX P 0 mwali .
PFX P 0 mwaga .
PFX P 0 mwaka .
PFX P 0 mwabu .
PFX P 0 mwalu .
PFX P 0 mwaku .
PFX P 0 mwatu .
PFX P 0 baan [^lmn]
PFX P l baand l.[^mn]
PFX P l baann l.[mn]
PFX P w baamp [w]
PFX P 0 baamu .
PFX P 0 baaba .
PFX P 0 baagu .
PFX P 0 baagi .
PFX P 0 baazi .
PFX P 0 baaki .
PFX P 0 baabi .
PFX P 0 baali .
PFX P 0 baaga .
PFX P 0 baaka .
PFX P 0 baabu .
PFX P 0 baalu .
PFX P 0 baaku .
PFX P 0 baatu .
PFX P 0 abaan [^lmn]
PFX P l abaand l.[^mn]
PFX P l abaann l.[mn]
PFX P w abaamp [w]
PFX P 0 abaamu .
PFX P 0 abaaba .
PFX P 0 abaagu .
PFX P 0 abaagi .
PFX P 0 abaazi .
PFX P 0 abaaki .
PFX P 0 abaabi .
PFX P 0 abaali .
PFX P 0 abaaga .
PFX P 0 abaaka .
PFX P 0 abaabu .
PFX P 0 abaalu .
PFX P 0 abaaku .
PFX P 0 abaatu .
PFX P 0 gwan [^lmn]
PFX P l gwand l.[^mn]
PFX P l gwann l.[mn]
PFX P w gwamp [w]
PFX P 0 gwamu .
PFX P 0 gwaba .
PFX P 0 gwagu .
PFX P 0 gwagi .
PFX P 0 gwazi .
PFX P 0 gwaki .
PFX P 0 gwabi .
PFX P 0 gwali .
PFX P 0 gwaga .
PFX P 0 gwaka .
PFX P 0 gwabu .
PFX P 0 gwalu .
PFX P 0 gwaku .
PFX P 0 gwatu .
PFX P 0 ogwan [^lmn]
PFX P l ogwand l.[^mn]
PFX P l ogwann l.[mn]
PFX P w ogwamp [w]
PFX P 0 ogwamu .
PFX P 0 ogwaba .
PFX P 0 ogwagu .
PFX P 0 ogwagi .
PFX P 0 ogwazi .
PFX P 0 ogwaki .
PFX P 0 ogwabi .
PFX P 0 ogwali .
PFX P 0 ogwaga .
PFX P 0 ogwaka .
PFX P 0 ogwabu .
PFX P 0 ogwalu .
PFX P 0 ogwaku .
PFX P 0 ogwatu .
PFX P 0 gyan [^lmn]
PFX P l gyand l.[^mn]
PFX P l gyann l.[mn]
PFX P w gyamp [w]
PFX P 0 gyamu .
PFX P 0 gyaba .
PFX P 0 gyagu .
PFX P 0 gyagi .
PFX P 0 gyazi .
PFX P 0 gyaki .
PFX P 0 gyabi .
PFX P 0 gyali .
PFX P 0 gyaga .
PFX P 0 gyaka .
PFX P 0 gyabu .
PFX P 0 gyalu .
PFX P 0 gyaku .
PFX P 0 gyatu .
PFX P 0 egyan [^lmn]
PFX P l egyand l.[^mn]
PFX P l egyann l.[mn]
PFX P w egyamp [w]
PFX P 0 egyamu .
PFX P 0 egyaba .
PFX P 0 egyagu .
PFX P 0 egyagi .
PFX P 0 egyazi .
PFX P 0 egyaki .
PFX P 0 egyabi .
PFX P 0 egyali .
PFX P 0 egyaga .
PFX P 0 egyaka .
PFX P 0 egyabu .
PFX P 0 egyalu .
PFX P 0 egyaku .
PFX P 0 egyatu .
PFX P 0 zaan [^lmn]
PFX P l zaand l.[^mn]
PFX P l zaann l.[mn]
PFX P w zaamp [w]
PFX P 0 zaamu .
PFX P 0 zaaba .
PFX P 0 zaagu .
PFX P 0 zaagi .
PFX P 0 zaazi .
PFX P 0 zaaki .
PFX P 0 zaabi .
PFX P 0 zaali .
PFX P 0 zaaga .
PFX P 0 zaaka .
PFX P 0 zaabu .
PFX P 0 zaalu .
PFX P 0 zaaku .
PFX P 0 zaatu .
PFX P 0 ezaan [^lmn]
PFX P l ezaand l.[^mn]
PFX P l ezaann l.[mn]
PFX P w ezaamp [w]
PFX P 0 ezaamu .
PFX P 0 ezaaba .
PFX P 0 ezaagu .
PFX P 0 ezaagi .
PFX P 0 ezaazi .
PFX P 0 ezaaki .
PFX P 0 ezaabi .
PFX P 0 ezaali .
PFX P 0 ezaaga .
PFX P 0 ezaaka .
PFX P 0 ezaabu .
PFX P 0 ezaalu .
PFX P 0 ezaaku .
PFX P 0 ezaatu .
PFX P 0 kyaa   [^lmn]
PFX P l kyaand l.[^mn]
PFX P l kyaann l.[mn]
PFX P w kyaamp [w]
PFX P 0 kyaamu .
PFX P 0 kyaaba .
PFX P 0 kyaagu .
PFX P 0 kyaagi .
PFX P 0 kyaazi .
PFX P 0 kyaaki .
PFX P 0 kyaabi .
PFX P 0 kyaali .
PFX P 0 kyaaga .
PFX P 0 kyaaka .
PFX P 0 kyaabu .
PFX P 0 kyaalu .
PFX P 0 kyaaku .
PFX P 0 kyaatu .
PFX P 0 ekyaan  [^lmn]
PFX P l ekyaand l.[^mn]
PFX P l ekyaann l.[mn]
PFX P w ekyaamp [w]
PFX P 0 ekyaamu .
PFX P 0 ekyaaba .
PFX P 0 ekyaagu .
PFX P 0 ekyaagi .
PFX P 0 ekyaazi .
PFX P 0 ekyaaki .
PFX P 0 ekyaabi .
PFX P 0 ekyaali .
PFX P 0 ekyaaga .
PFX P 0 ekyaaka .
PFX P 0 ekyaabu .
PFX P 0 ekyaalu .
PFX P 0 ekyaaku .
PFX P 0 ekyaatu .
PFX P 0 byaan [^lmn]
PFX P l byaand l.[^mn]
PFX P l byaann l.[mn]
PFX P w byaamp [w]
PFX P 0 byaamu .
PFX P 0 byaaba .
PFX P 0 byaagu .
PFX P 0 byaagi .
PFX P 0 byaazi .
PFX P 0 byaaki .
PFX P 0 byaabi .
PFX P 0 byaali .
PFX P 0 byaaga .
PFX P 0 byaaka .
PFX P 0 byaabu .
PFX P 0 byaalu .
PFX P 0 byaaku .
PFX P 0 byaatu .
PFX P 0 ebyaan [^lmn]
PFX P l ebyaand l.[^mn]
PFX P l ebyaann l.[mn]
PFX P w ebyaamp [w]
PFX P 0 ebyaamu .
PFX P 0 ebyaaba .
PFX P 0 ebyaagu .
PFX P 0 ebyaagi .
PFX P 0 ebyaazi .
PFX P 0 ebyaaki .
PFX P 0 ebyaabi .
PFX P 0 ebyaali .
PFX P 0 ebyaaga .
PFX P 0 ebyaaka .
PFX P 0 ebyaabu .
PFX P 0 ebyaalu .
PFX P 0 ebyaaku .
PFX P 0 ebyaatu .
PFX P 0 lyaan [^lmn]
PFX P l lyaand l.[^mn]
PFX P l lyaann l.[mn]
PFX P w lyaamp [w]
PFX P 0 lyaamu .
PFX P 0 lyaaba .
PFX P 0 lyaagu .
PFX P 0 lyaagi .
PFX P 0 lyaazi .
PFX P 0 lyaaki .
PFX P 0 lyaabi .
PFX P 0 lyaali .
PFX P 0 lyaaga .
PFX P 0 lyaaka .
PFX P 0 lyaabu .
PFX P 0 lyaalu .
PFX P 0 lyaaku .
PFX P 0 lyaatu .
PFX P 0 elyaan [^lmn]
PFX P l elyaand l.[^mn]
PFX P l elyaann l.[mn]
PFX P w elyaamp [w]
PFX P 0 elyaamu .
PFX P 0 elyaaba .
PFX P 0 elyaagu .
PFX P 0 elyaagi .
PFX P 0 elyaazi .
PFX P 0 elyaaki .
PFX P 0 elyaabi .
PFX P 0 elyaali .
PFX P 0 elyaaga .
PFX P 0 elyaaka .
PFX P 0 elyaabu .
PFX P 0 elyaalu .
PFX P 0 elyaaku .
PFX P 0 elyaatu .
PFX P 0 gaan [^lmn]
PFX P l gaand l.[^mn]
PFX P l gaann l.[mn]
PFX P w gaamp [w]
PFX P 0 gaamu .
PFX P 0 gaaba .
PFX P 0 gaagu .
PFX P 0 gaagi .
PFX P 0 gaazi .
PFX P 0 gaaki .
PFX P 0 gaabi .
PFX P 0 gaali .
PFX P 0 gaaga .
PFX P 0 gaaka .
PFX P 0 gaabu .
PFX P 0 gaalu .
PFX P 0 gaaku .
PFX P 0 gaatu .
PFX P 0 agaan [^lmn]
PFX P l agaand l.[^mn]
PFX P l agaann l.[mn]
PFX P w agaamp [w]
PFX P 0 agaamu .
PFX P 0 agaaba .
PFX P 0 agaagu .
PFX P 0 agaagi .
PFX P 0 agaazi .
PFX P 0 agaaki .
PFX P 0 agaabi .
PFX P 0 agaali .
PFX P 0 agaaga .
PFX P 0 agaaka .
PFX P 0 agaabu .
PFX P 0 agaalu .
PFX P 0 agaaku .
PFX P 0 agaatu .
PFX P 0 kaan [^lmn]
PFX P l kaand l.[^mn]
PFX P l kaann l.[mn]
PFX P w kaamp [w]
PFX P 0 kaamu .
PFX P 0 kaaba .
PFX P 0 kaagu .
PFX P 0 kaagi .
PFX P 0 kaazi .
PFX P 0 kaaki .
PFX P 0 kaabi .
PFX P 0 kaali .
PFX P 0 kaaga .
PFX P 0 kaaka .
PFX P 0 kaabu .
PFX P 0 kaalu .
PFX P 0 kaaku .
PFX P 0 kaatu .
PFX P 0 akaan [^lmn]
PFX P l akaand l.[^mn]
PFX P l akaann l.[mn]
PFX P w akaamp [w]
PFX P 0 akaamu .
PFX P 0 akaaba .
PFX P 0 akaagu .
PFX P 0 akaagi .
PFX P 0 akaazi .
PFX P 0 akaaki .
PFX P 0 akaabi .
PFX P 0 akaali .
PFX P 0 akaaga .
PFX P 0 akaaka .
PFX P 0 akaabu .
PFX P 0 akaalu .
PFX P 0 akaaku .
PFX P 0 akaatu .
PFX P 0 bwan [^lmn]
PFX P l bwand l.[^mn]
PFX P l bwann l.[mn]
PFX P w bwamp [w]
PFX P 0 bwamu .
PFX P 0 bwaba .
PFX P 0 bwagu .
PFX P 0 bwagi .
PFX P 0 bwazi .
PFX P 0 bwaki .
PFX P 0 bwabi .
PFX P 0 bwali .
PFX P 0 bwaga .
PFX P 0 bwaka .
PFX P 0 bwabu .
PFX P 0 bwalu .
PFX P 0 bwaku .
